District of Columbia statutes.
7-1203.05a

Disclosures to correctional institutions or law enforcement officials.

(a)

A mental health professional or mental health facility may disclose to a correctional institution or a law enforcement official having lawful custody of an individual mental health information about the individual to facilitate the delivery of mental health services and mental health supports to the individual.

(b)

Any disclosure of mental health information under this section shall be limited to the minimum necessary to facilitate the delivery of mental health services and mental health supports.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 305a
as added Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 204(c), 56 DCR 7413

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 204(c) of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-181, August 6, 2009, 56 DCR 6903).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 204(c) of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).